Louisiana, session 2026, HB595.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4.4. Exclusive jurisdiction
It is the intent of the legislature that this Subtitle vests the department with
exclusive jurisdiction over the natural resources of the state, including but not limited
to regulations, permitting, and related fee schedules. No other political subdivision,
local governing authority, or municipal or parochial permitting body may use
inaction on local permitting decisions to unreasonably interfere with activities
permitted by the department. Any application for a local road permit related to a
department-permitted activity which has not been approved or denied, with written
reasons for denial provided to the applicant, within thirty days of submission shall
be deemed approved.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.